test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-vaaska_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - vaaskâ: # 2A
    vaaskâ+N+Sg+Nom: vaaskâ
    vaaskâ+N+Sg+Gen: vaskâm
    vaaskâ+N+Sg+Acc: vaskâm
    vaaskâ+N+Sg+Ill: vaskâmân
    vaaskâ+N+Sg+Loc: vaskâmist
    vaaskâ+N+Sg+Com: vaskâmáin
    vaaskâ+N+Sg+Abe: vaskâmttáá
    vaaskâ+N+Ess: vaaskân               #vaskâmin
    vaaskâ+N+Par: vaaskâd               #vaskâmid
    vaaskâ+N+Pl+Nom: vaskâmeh
    vaaskâ+N+Pl+Gen: vaskâmij
    vaaskâ+N+Pl+Acc: vaskâmijd
    vaaskâ+N+Pl+Ill: vaskâmáid
    vaaskâ+N+Pl+Loc: vaskâmijn
    vaaskâ+N+Pl+Com: vaskâmijguin
    vaaskâ+N+Pl+Abe: vaskâmijttáá
